Utah, session 2026, HB196.
Section 1. Section 72-3-104 is amended to read:72-3-104. City streets -- Class C roads -- Construction and maintenance.(1)City streets comprise:(a)highways, roads, circulator alleys, and streets within the corporate limits of the municipalities that are not designated as class A state roads or as class B roads; and(b)those highways, roads, and streets located within a national forest and constructed or maintained by the municipality under agreement with the appropriate federal agency.(2)City streets are class C roads.(3)Except for city streets within counties of the first and second class, as classified under Section 17-60-104, the state and city have joint undivided interest in the title to all rights-of-way for all city streets.(4)(a)The Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), and Chapter 4, Part 4, Special Designation and Naming of Local Highways, a municipal governing body exercises sole jurisdiction and control of the city streets within the municipality.(b)The Legislature may make a special designation of a class C road as provided in Chapter 4, Part 4, Special Designation and Naming of Local Highways.(5)The department shall cooperate with the municipal legislative body in the construction and maintenance of the class C roads within each municipality.(6)The municipal legislative body shall expend or cause to be expended upon the class C roads the funds allocated to each municipality from the Transportation Fund under rules made by the department.(7)Any town or city in the third, fourth, or fifth class may:(a)contract with the county or the department for the construction and maintenance of class C roads within its corporate limits; or(b)transfer, with the consent of the county, its:(i)class C roads to the class B road system; and(ii)funds allocated from the Transportation Fund to the municipality to the county legislative body for use upon the transferred class C roads.(8)A municipal legislative body of any city of the third, fourth, or fifth class may use any portion of the class C road funds allocated to the municipality for the construction of sidewalks, curbs, and gutters on class A state roads within the municipal limits by cooperative agreement with the department.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 72-4-401 is enacted to read:4. Special Designation and Naming of Local Highways.72-4-401. Special Designation and Naming of Local Highways.(1)The Legislature may make a special designation of or name a class C road.(2)Except as provided in this section, the designation or naming of a class C road does not alter the duties of a municipality to exercise jurisdiction and control of the class C road.(3)If the Legislature makes a special designation of or names a class C road, the municipality:(a)shall remove any existing designation or name of the same class C road;(b)shall coordinate with the department for the installation of appropriate signs along the designated highway; and(c)may not make a different or additional designation of the same class C road.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 72-4-402 is enacted to read:72-4-402. Charlie Kirk Boulevard.(1)There is established Charlie Kirk Boulevard composed of the existing class C road in Salt Lake City known as 900 South.(2)In addition to the designation of the road as 900 South, the department and Salt Lake City shall designate and name the highway identified in Subsection (1) as Charlie Kirk Boulevard on future state and local highway maps.(3)As soon as practicable, and in coordination with Salt Lake City, the department shall install appropriate signs along portions of the highway indicating the designation and name as Charlie Kirk Boulevard as described in Subsection (1).

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.